Utah statutes.
59-10-1102.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b) or Subsection 59-10-1103(1)(a), "claimant" means a resident or nonresident person.

(b)  "Claimant" does not include an estate or trust.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection 59-10-1103(1)(a), "estate" means a nonresident estate or a resident estate.

(3)  "Refundable tax credit" or "tax credit" means a tax credit that a claimant, estate, or trust may claim:

(a)  as provided by statute; and

(b)  regardless of whether the claimant, estate, or trust has a tax liability under this chapter for a taxable year.

(4)  Except as provided in Subsection 59-10-1103(1)(a), "trust" means a nonresident trust or a resident trust.



Enacted by Chapter 223, 2006 General Session

